Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 1. Venue in Civil Matters.

§ 16.1-76.
Venue.

In all civil actions over which the general district courts have jurisdiction pursuant to §

16.1-77

, venue shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (§

8.01-257

et seq.) of Title 8.01.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 624; 1978, c. 421.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Venue, § 5.